Rhode Island statutes. Title 25 Holidays and Days of Special Observance
Chapter 1 Holidays

25-1-1.
General holidays enumerated.

The first day of January or, in the event that day is a Saturday or Sunday, then state employees will celebrate the holiday on the following Monday (as New Year’s Day), the third Monday of January (as Dr. Martin Luther King, Jr.’s Birthday), the third Monday of February (as Washington’s Birthday), the fourth day of May (as Rhode Island Independence Day), the last Monday of May (as Memorial Day), the fourth day of July or, in the event that day is a Saturday or Sunday, then state employees will celebrate the holiday on the following Monday (as Independence Day), the second Monday of August (as Victory Day), the first Monday of September (as Labor Day), the second Monday of October (as Columbus Day), the eleventh day of November or, in the event that day is a Saturday or Sunday, then state employees will celebrate the holiday on the following Monday (as Veterans’ Day), the twenty-fifth day of December, or in the event that day is a Saturday or Sunday, then state employees will celebrate the holiday on the following Monday (as Christmas Day), and each of the above days in every year, or when either of the above days falls on the first day of the week, then the day following it, the Tuesday next after the first Monday in November in each year in which a general election of state officers is held (as election day), the first day of every week (commonly called Sunday), and any other days as the governor or general assembly of this state or the president or the congress of the United States shall appoint as holidays for any purpose, days of thanksgiving, or days of solemn fast, shall be holidays.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 166, § 8; P.L. 1896, ch. 334, § 1; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 36; G.L. 1909, ch. 201, § 5; P.L. 1910, ch. 528, § 1; P.L. 1914, ch. 1053, § 1; P.L. 1921, ch. 2099, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 228, § 5; P.L. 1936, ch. 2282, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 458, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 1995, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-1-1

; P.L. 1966, ch. 156, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 31, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 62, § 1; P.L. 1984, ch. 329, § 1; P.L. 1987, ch. 319, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 248, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 542, § 73; P.L. 1994, ch. 70, art. 26, § 1.

25-1-1.1.
Display of the POW-MIA flag at State House.

On each and every day of the year, the governor shall cause a display of the POW-MIA flag under the national flag at the State House from sunrise to sunset.

History of Section.

P.L. 1987, ch. 74, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 502, § 1.

25-1-1.2.
Display of POW-MIA flag in cities and towns.

Every city and town is authorized to display the prisoner of war and missing in action (POW-MIA) flag on one or more of the existing flagpoles in the city or town.

History of Section.

P.L. 1989, ch. 250, § 1.

25-1-1.3.
Victory Day — Prohibition against use of other name for holiday.

No state or municipal governmental department or agency shall refer to the second Monday of August, “Victory Day” by any other name in an advertisement paid for by the department or agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1999, ch. 365, § 1.

25-1-2.
Thanksgiving Day.

The governor shall annually appoint a day of public thanksgiving, and shall announce the day by proclamation to the people of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 15, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 21, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 20, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 6, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

25-1-2

.

25-1-3.
Saturday bank closing — Filing of resolution.

Any bank, savings bank, trust company, safe deposit company, building-loan association, national banking association, or federal savings and loan association doing business within the state of Rhode Island, or any branch or office of the institution, may remain closed on any Saturday or Saturdays upon the adoption of a resolution to close by the board of directors or their board of trustees and upon filing a copy of the resolution as required in this section. The resolution is deemed effective for the purposes of this section and §

25-1-4

only when a copy certified by the proper officer of the institution is filed in the office of the director of business regulation, and the resolution remains in full force and effect until a copy of a later resolution, certified in the same manner, terminating the prior resolution, is filed in the office of the director of business regulation.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 458, § 2; P.L. 1947, ch. 1817, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-1-3

.

25-1-4.
Effect of Saturday closing on rights and obligations.

Any Saturday upon which any bank, savings bank, trust company, safe deposit company, building-loan association, national banking association, or federal savings and loan association, or any branch or office of the institution shall remain closed pursuant to the provisions of §

25-1-3

and this section shall, with respect to the closed institution, branch, or office, be a holiday for the purpose of chapter 3 of title 6A. If any bank, savings bank, trust company, safe deposit company, building-loan association, national banking association, or federal savings and loan association, or any branch or office of the institution shall close on any Saturday pursuant to the provisions of §

25-1-3

, any act which would be required to be performed on any Saturday at or by the institution, or any branch or office of the institution, if the institution, branch, or office of the institution were not closed, shall be performed on the next succeeding business day, and any act which would be authorized or permitted to be performed on any Saturday at or by the institution, or any branch or office of the institution, if the institution, branch, or office of the institution were not closed, may be performed on the next succeeding business day. No liability or loss of rights of any kind shall result from the failure to perform any of those acts while closed on any Saturday.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 458, § 2; P.L. 1947, ch. 1817, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-1-4

.

25-1-5.
Saturday closing of public offices.

The several administrative offices of state and municipal governments may remain closed on any Saturday or Saturdays by executive order of the governor in the case of state administrative government and in the case of a municipal government by the adoption of a resolution by the municipal council. Any Saturday when the several administrative offices of state, city, and town governments, or any branch, division, or independent agency of the state or municipality shall remain closed pursuant to the provisions of this section shall, with respect to the closed administrative office, branch, division, or independent agency of the state or municipality be a holiday for the purpose of chapter 3 of title 6A. If any state or municipal administrative offices, or any branch, division, or independent agency of the state or municipality shall close on any Saturday pursuant to the provisions of this section, any act which would be required to be performed on any Saturday at or by the administrative office, or any branch, division, or independent agency, of the state or municipality, if the administrative office, branch, division, or independent agency of the state or municipality were not closed, shall be performed on the next succeeding business day, and any act which would be authorized or permitted to be performed on any Saturday at or by the administrative office, or any branch, division, or independent agency of the state or municipality if the administrative office, branch, division, or independent agency were not closed, may be performed on the next succeeding business day. No liability or loss of rights of any kind shall result from the failure to perform any of those acts while closed on any Saturday.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 458, § 3; P.L. 1953, ch. 3075, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

25-1-5

.

25-1-6 — 25-1-8.
Repealed.

25-1-9.
City and town appropriations for public celebrations.

The several cities and towns may annually appropriate and expend money for the celebration of public occasions.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 36, § 8; P.L. 1899, ch. 660, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 46, § 8; P.L. 1910, ch. 641, § 1; P.L. 1911, ch. 658, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 47, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 329, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

25-1-9

; P.L. 1974, ch. 140, § 1.